Colorado, session 2026A, HB1362.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-120, amend
(3); and repeal (1)(c), (2), (3.5), (4), and (5) as follows:
24-38.5-120. Decarbonization tax credits administration cash
fund - definitions - repeal.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(c) "Fund" means the decarbonization tax credits administration
cash fund created in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The decarbonization tax credits administration cash fund is
hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to
the fund pursuant to section 39-29-108 (2)(e)(I) and any other money that
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.
(3) (a) Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, For
state fiscal years 2023-24 2027-2028 through 2034-35, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE MONEY TO the office and the department may
expend money from the fund for THE direct and indirect costs associated
with the implementation and administration of the decarbonization tax
credits.
(b) (I) Money in the fund may also be used to repay administrative
costs to the respective cash funds. The state treasurer shall transfer money
from the fund in the amount attributable to administrative costs to the
respective cash funds so that all administrative costs are repaid to the
respective cash funds on or before June 29, 2024.
(II) As used in this subsection (3)(b), unless the context otherwise
requires:
(A) "Administrative costs" means the amount of money expended
from the respective cash funds by the office and the department for the
administration and implementation of certain income tax credits, as
provided for in sections 24-38.5-116 (6)(b)(II), 24-38.5-118 (7)(d),
24-38.5-506 (2)(b), and of the temporary specific ownership tax rate
reduction for electric medium-duty and heavy-duty trucks that are part of a
fleet as provided for in section 25-7-1405 (2)(b).
(B) "Respective cash funds" means the industrial and manufacturing
operations clean air grant program cash fund created in section 24-38.5-116
(6), the geothermal energy grant fund created in section 24-38.5-118 (7), the
community access to electric bicycles cash fund created in section
24-38.5-506, and the electrifying school buses grant program cash fund
created in section 25-7-1405.
(3.5) (a) On January 1, 2026, the state treasurer shall transfer two
million five hundred thousand dollars from the fund to the energy and
carbon management cash fund created in section 34-60-122 (5).
(b) This subsection (3.5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.
(4) The state treasurer shall transfer all unexpended and
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1362

unencumbered money in the fund on June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and
June 30, 2026, to the general fund; except that the balance of money
remaining in the fund not including expended and encumbered money shall
not be less than three hundred thousand dollars.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, on July 1, 2036,
the state treasurer shall transfer all money in the fund to the general fund.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-116, amend
(6)(b)(II) as follows:
24-38.5-116. Industrial and manufacturing operations clean air
grant program - creation - eligibility - fund created - gifts, grants, or
donations - transfer - legislative declaration - definitions - reporting -
repeal.
(6) Fund.
(b) (II) For state fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, the office and,
subject to annual appropriation, the department of revenue may expend
money from the fund for the administration and implementation of the
industrial clean energy tax credit created in section 39-22-551 and the tax
credit for sustainable aviation fuel production facility created in section
39-22-556. The office shall keep an accounting of all money expended from
the fund pursuant to this subsection (6)(b)(II). for purposes of calculating
the repayment of the administrative costs required by section 24-38.5-120
(3)
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-118, amend
(7)(d) as follows:
24-38.5-118. Geothermal energy grant program - creation -
procedures - fund - report - definitions - legislative declaration - repeal.
(7) Fund.
(d) For state fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, the office and,
subject to annual appropriation, the department of revenue may expend
money in the fund for the administration and implementation of the tax
credit for expenditures made in connection with a geothermal energy project
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1362

created in section 39-22-552, the geothermal electricity generation
production tax credit created in section 39-22-553, and the heat pump
technology and thermal energy network tax credit created in section
39-22-554. The office shall keep an accounting of all money expended from
the fund pursuant to this subsection (7)(d). for purposes of calculating the
repayment of the administrative costs required by section 24-38.5-120 (3)
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-506, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
24-38.5-506. Community access to electric bicycles cash fund -
creation - gifts, grants, or donations - transfer - repeal.
(2) (b) For state fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, the office and,
subject to annual appropriation, the department of revenue may expend
money in the fund for the administration and implementation of the electric
bicycle tax credit created in section 39-22-555. The office shall keep an
accounting of all money expended from the fund pursuant to this subsection
(2)(b). for purposes of calculating the repayment of the administrative costs
required by section 24-38.5-120 (3)
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-1405, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
25-7-1405. Electrifying school buses grant program cash fund
- creation - gifts, grants, and donations - transfer - repeal.
(2) (b) For state fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, and subject to
annual appropriation, the Colorado energy office, created in section
24-38.5-101, and the department of revenue may expend money from the
fund for the administration and implementation of the innovative motor
vehicles and innovative trucks tax credits created in sections 39-22-516.7
and 39-22-516.8 and for the specific ownership tax rate reduction for
electric medium-duty and heavy-duty trucks that are part of a fleet as set
forth in section 42-3-107 (1)(a)(IV). The office shall keep an accounting of
all money expended from the fund pursuant to this subsection (2)(b). for
purposes of calculating the repayment of the administrative costs required
by section 24-38.5-120 (3)
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-60-122, repeal
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1362

(5)(f) as follows:
34-60-122. Expenses - energy and carbon management cash
fund created - repeal.
(5) (f) (I) On June 30, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer two
million five hundred thousand dollars from the energy and carbon
management cash fund to the decarbonization tax credits administration
cash fund created in section 24-38.5-120 (2).
(II) This subsection (5)(f) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-29-108, amend
(2)(b); and repeal (2)(e) as follows:
39-29-108. Allocation of severance tax revenues - definitions -
repeal.
(2) (b) Except as set forth in subsections (2)(d) and (2)(e)
SUBSECTION (2)(d) of this section, of the total gross receipts realized from
the severance taxes imposed on minerals and mineral fuels under the
provisions of this article after June 30, 2017, fifty percent shall be credited
to the state severance tax trust fund created by section 39-29-109, and fifty
percent shall be credited to the local government severance tax fund created
by section 39-29-110.
(e) (I) For the state fiscal years 2023-24 through 2026-27, the state
treasurer shall credit the discrete increased amount of severance tax for oil
and gas production that is attributable to the reduction of the credit against
tax pursuant to section 39-29-105 (2)(b)(II) to the decarbonization tax
credits administration cash fund created in section 24-38.5-120 (2); except
that, for state fiscal years 2024-25 and 2025-26, money credited to the
decarbonization tax credits administration cash fund shall not exceed the net
revenue from the oil and gas severance tax collection.
(II) Repealed.
(III) As used in this subsection (2)(e), unless the context otherwise
requires:
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1362

(A) Repealed.
(B) "Discrete increased amount of severance tax for oil and gas
production" means the amount of tax collected that is attributable to a
twelve and one-half percent reduction in the severance tax credit for oil and
gas production set forth in section 39-29-105 (2)(b)(II) for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2024, but before January 1, 2026.
(C) Repealed.
(IV) This subsection (2)(e) is repealed, effective December 31,
2036.
SECTION 8. Effective date. This act takes effect only if House
Bill 26-1405 becomes law, in which case this act takes effect on July 1,
2027.
SECTION 9. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1362

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1362